Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4612.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to provide for changing and determining the names of divorced women.individuals. Sec. 1. The circuit courts of this state, whenever a decree when a judgment of divorce is granted, may, at the instance request of the woman, a party to the action, whether complainant plaintiff or defendant, decree to restore to her her the party's birth name, or the surname she the party legally bore prior to her before the marriage to the husband spouse in the divorce action, or allow her the party to adopt another surname if the party does not seek the change is not sought with any fraudulent or evil intent. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution ____ (request no. S00781'25) or House Joint Resolution F (request no. H00781'25) of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.